Utah statutes.
41-6a-1001.   Pedestrians subject to traffic-control devices -- Other controls.

(1)  A pedestrian shall obey the instructions of a traffic-control device specifically applicable to the pedestrian unless otherwise directed by a peace officer.

(2) A pedestrian is subject to traffic and pedestrian-control signals under Sections 41-6a-305 and 41-6a-306.

